Hawaii statutes.
[§448B-11] Revocation, suspension, denial,
or condition of licenses; fines. In addition to any other acts or
conditions provided by law, the director may refuse to renew, reinstate, or
restore, or may deny, revoke, suspend, fine, or condition in any manner any
license for any one or more of the following acts or conditions on the part of
the applicant or licensed dietitian:

(1) Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction
of a crime that the director has determined to be of a nature that renders the person
convicted unfit to practice dietetics;

(2) Failure to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary decision related to dietetic practice issued against the licensed
dietitian or the applicant in any jurisdiction within thirty days of the disciplinary
decision or within twenty days of licensure;

(3) Violation of recognized ethical standards for
dietitians as set by the association;

(4) Use of fraud, deception, or misrepresentation in
obtaining a license;

(5) Revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary
action by another state, territory, federal agency, or country against the
licensed dietitian or applicant for any reason provided under this section; or

(6) Other just and sufficient cause that renders a
person unfit to practice dietetics. [L 2000, c 280, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next